Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-802 of Title 29, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A fish hatchery licensed or operated by the Department of


Wildlife Conservation that generates electricity on the premises to


offset the hatchery’s energy requirements shall not be considered a


public utility, as defined in Section 151 of Title 17 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, if the hatchery meets the requirements set forth


in subsection B of Section 151 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3517 YG 1/15/2026 1:08:06 PM



Req. No. 3517 Page 1